csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_Cnj_s.yaml
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mawadisigosiiwaanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mawadisigowaanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: mawadishisiiwegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: mawadishiwegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: mawadishisiiwanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: mawadishiwanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: mawadishisiiwaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: mawadishiwaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: mawadishisiigwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: mawadishigwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg: mawadisigoosiiwaanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg: mawadisigoowaanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mawadisigosiwaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mawadisigoyaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: mawadishisiweg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: mawadishiyeg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: mawadishisiwan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: mawadishiyan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: mawadishisigwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: mawadishiwaad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: mawadishisig
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: mawadishid
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg: mawadisigoosiwaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: mawadisigooyaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mawadisigosiwaambaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+1Sg: mawadisigoyaambaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: mawadishisiwegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: mawadishiyegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: mawadishisiwamban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: mawadishiyamban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: mawadishisigwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: mawadishiwaapan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: mawadishisigoban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: mawadishipan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg: mawadisigoosiwaambaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg: mawadisigooyaambaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mawadisigosiiwegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mawadisigowegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: mawadisisinowagoogwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: mawadisinagoogwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: mawadisigoosiiwegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: mawadisigoowegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: mawadisigoosiiwanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: mawadisigoowanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl: mawadisisiinogwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl: mawadisinogwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl: mawadisigoosiiwegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl: mawadisigoowegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mawadisigosiweg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mawadisigoyeg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: mawadisisinowagog
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: mawadisinagog
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: mawadisisinowegwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: mawadisinegwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: mawadisisinoweg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: mawadisineg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl: mawadisigosiweg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: mawadisigooyeg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl: mawadisigoosiweg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: mawadisigooyeg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mawadisigosiwegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Pl: mawadisigoyegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: mawadisisinowagoogoban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: mawadisinagoogoban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: mawadisigoosiwegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: mawadisigooyegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: mawadisigoosiwamban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: mawadisigooyamban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl: mawadisisinokwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl: mawadisikwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl: mawadisigoosiwegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl: mawadisigooyegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mawadisigosiiwanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mawadisigowanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: mawadisisiinowaanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: mawadisinowaanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: mawadisisiinowegwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: mawadisinowegwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: mawadisisiinowegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: mawadisinowegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg: mawadisisiinogwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg: mawadisinogwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg: mawadisigoosiiwanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg: mawadisigoowanen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mawadisigosiwan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mawadisigoyan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: mawadisisinowaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: mawadisinaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: mawadisisinokwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: mawadisikwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: mawadisisinok
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: mawadisik
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg: mawadisigoosiwan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: mawadisigooyan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg: mawadisigoosiwan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: mawadisigooyan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mawadisigosiwamban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+2Sg: mawadisigoyamban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: mawadisisinowaambaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: mawadisinaambaan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: mawadisisinowegwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: mawadisinegwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: mawadisisinowegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: mawadisinegiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg: mawadisisinokiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg: mawadisikiban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg: mawadisigoosiwamban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg: mawadisigooyamban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mawadisigosiiwaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mawadisigowaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwaawagwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlProx: mawadisaawagwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwaawegwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: mawadisaawegwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwaawadwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: mawadisaawadwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mawadisigosiiwaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mawadisigowaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwaawangidwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: mawadisaawangidwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwaawangwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: mawadisaawangwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwaawindwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx: mawadisaawindwaawen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mawadisigosigwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mawadisigowaad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwagwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: mawadisagwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwegwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: mawadisegwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwadwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: mawadisadwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mawadisigosigwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mawadisigowaad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwangidwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: mawadisangidwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwangwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: mawadisangwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwindwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: mawadisindwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mawadisigosigwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3PlProx: mawadisigowaapan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwagwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: mawadisagwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwegwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: mawadisegwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwadwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: mawadisadwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mawadisigosigwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3PlProx: mawadisigowaapan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwangidwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: mawadisangidwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwangwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: mawadisangwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx: mawadisaasiwindwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx: mawadisindwaaban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisigosiinigwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisigonigwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwaawagen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaawagen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwaawegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaawegwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwaawaden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaawaden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaasiwaawaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaawaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaasiigwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaagwen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwaawangiden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaawangiden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwaawangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaawangen
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwaawinden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaawinden
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisigosinig
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisigonid
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwag
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimag
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiweg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimeg
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaasigwaa
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaawaad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaasig
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisaad
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwangid
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimangid
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimang
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwind
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimind
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisigosinigoban
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisigonipan
     mawadish+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: mawadisimaasiwagiban
